District of Columbia statutes.
34-1264.06

Additional transition provisions.

(a)

All appointments, rules, regulations, orders, administrative issuances, obligations, determinations, and agreements made, established, issued, promulgated, or entered into by the Office of Cable Television or the Office of Motion Picture and Television Development shall remain in effect until amended, modified, superseded, or repealed by the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment.

(b)

All unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, income, and other funds available to the Office of Cable Television or the Office of Motion Picture and Television Development shall be transferred to the appropriate accounts of the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment.

(c)

All lawful existing contractual rights and obligations of the Office of Cable Television or the Office of Motion Picture and Television Development shall transfer to the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment, which shall assume all rights, duties, liabilities, and obligations as a successor in interest.

Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 1406
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2072(i), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2072(i) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).